Colorado, session 2026A, HB1291.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, amend 22-9-102 as
follows:
22-9-102. Legislative declaration.
(1) The general assembly hereby declares that:
(a) A system to evaluate EVALUATING the effectiveness of
licensed personnel is crucial ESSENTIAL to improving the quality of
education in this state and declares that such a system shall be applicable
to all licensed personnel in the school districts and boards of cooperative
services throughout the state; and INSTRUCTION AND STUDENT OUTCOMES
IN PUBLIC SCHOOLS;
(b) The purposes of the evaluation shall be to: LOCAL BOARDS OF
EDUCATION AND BOARDS OF COOPERATIVE SERVICES ARE BEST
POSITIONED TO DESIGN AND IMPLEMENT EVALUATION SYSTEMS THAT
REFLECT LOCAL NEEDS AND STAFFING REALITIES, CONSISTENT WITH
GUIDING STATE STANDARDS;
(I) Serve as a basis for the improvement of instruction;
(II) Enhance the implementation of programs of curriculum;
(III) Serve as a measurement of the professional growth and
development of licensed personnel;
(IV) Evaluate the level of performance based on the effectiveness
of licensed personnel; and
(V) Provide a basis for making decisions in the areas of hiring,
-2- HB26-1291

compensation, promotion, assignment, professional development, earning
and retaining nonprobationary status, dismissal, and nonrenewal of
contract.
(c) REQUIRING ANNUAL FORMAL EVALUATIONS FOR ALL
NONPROBATIONARY TEACHERS CAN STRAIN LIMITED ADMINISTRATIVE
CAPACITY WITHOUT NECESSARILY IMPROVING INSTRUCTIONAL PRACTICE;
AND
(d) ALLOWING DISTRICTS TO CONDUCT FORMAL EVALUATIONS OF
NONPROBATIONARY TEACHERS ON A PERIODIC BASIS, WHILE MAINTAINING
ANNUAL EVALUATIONS FOR PROBATIONARY AND LESS THAN EFFECTIVE
TEACHERS, SUPPORTS MEANINGFUL FEEDBACK, INSTRUCTIONAL
IMPROVEMENT, AND ADMINISTRATIVE EFFICIENCY.
(2) The general assembly further declares that a professionally
sound and credible system to evaluate the effectiveness of licensed
personnel shall be designed with the involvement of licensed personnel
and citizens of the school district or board of cooperative services
THEREFORE, IT IS THE INTENT OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY TO GRANT
LOCAL SCHOOL BOARDS OR BOARDS OF COOPERATIVE SERVICES
FLEXIBILITY REGARDING EVALUATION FREQUENCY AND THE DESIGNATION
OF QUALIFIED EVALUATORS WITHIN THEIR LICENSED PERSONNEL
EVALUATION SYSTEMS.
(3) The general assembly further declares that the involvement
and support of parents of children in public schools, acting as partners
with teachers and public school administrators, are key to the educational
progress of their children.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 22-9-106, amend (1)
introductory portion, (1)(c) introductory portion, and (1)(c)(II); and add
-3- HB26-1291

(10) as follows:
22-9-106. Local boards of education - duties - performance
evaluation system - compliance - rules.
(1) All school districts and boards A LOCAL BOARD OR A BOARD
of cooperative services that employ EMPLOYS licensed personnel shall
adopt a written system to evaluate the employment performance of school
district and OR board of cooperative services licensed personnel,
including all teachers, principals, and administrators, with the exception
of licensed personnel employed by a board of cooperative services for a
period of six weeks or less. In developing the licensed personnel
performance evaluation system and any amendments, thereto the local
board and board of cooperative services shall comply with subsection
(1.5) of this section and shall consult with administrators, principals, and
teachers employed within the district or participating districts in a board
of cooperative services, parents, and the school district licensed personnel
performance evaluation council or the board of cooperative services
personnel performance evaluation council created pursuant to section
22-9-107. The performance evaluation system must address all of the
performance standards established by rule of the state board and adopted
by the general assembly pursuant to section 22-9-105.5, and must contain,
but need not be limited to, the following information:
(c) The frequency and duration of the evaluations, which must be
on a regular basis and of such A frequency and duration as to ensure THAT
ENSURES the collection of a sufficient amount of data from which reliable
conclusions and findings may be drawn. At a minimum, the performance
LICENSED PERSONNEL evaluation system must ensure that:
(II) (A) Nonprobationary teachers receive at least one
-4- HB26-1291

DOCUMENTED observation each academic year and one evaluation that
results in a written evaluation report pursuant to subsection (3) of this
section each academic year according to the performance standards
established by rule of the state board and adopted by the general assembly
pursuant to section 22-9-105.5. Nonprobationary teachers AT LEAST ONCE
EVERY THREE ACADEMIC YEARS. A NONPROBATIONARY TEACHER must
receive the written evaluation report at least two weeks before the last
class day of the school year IN WHICH THE EVALUATION IS CONDUCTED.
(B) FOR A NONPROBATIONARY TEACHER WHO RECEIVES A LESS
THAN EFFECTIVE RATING, THE LOCAL BOARD OR BOARD OF COOPERATIVE
SERVICES SHALL REQUIRE THAT THE NONPROBATIONARY TEACHER
RECEIVES AT LEAST ONE DOCUMENTED OBSERVATION IN THE NEXT
ACADEMIC YEAR AND ONE EVALUATION THAT RESULTS IN A WRITTEN
EVALUATION REPORT PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (3) OF THIS SECTION IN
THE NEXT ACADEMIC YEAR.
(10) THIS SECTION, INCLUDING SUBSECTION (1)(c) OF THIS SECTION
CONCERNING THE FREQUENCY OF FORMAL EVALUATIONS, DOES NOT
PROHIBIT A LOCAL BOARD OR BOARD OF COOPERATIVE SERVICES FROM
ADOPTING, OR A SCHOOL DISTRICT OR BOARD OF COOPERATIVE SERVICES
FROM IMPLEMENTING AND MAINTAINING, A LICENSED PERSONNEL
EVALUATION POLICY OR LICENSED PERSONNEL EVALUATION SYSTEM THAT
INCLUDES INFORMAL EVALUATIONS, OBSERVATIONS, COACHING, OR
FEEDBACK THAT IS UNRELATED TO THE EVALUATION DESCRIBED IN THIS
SECTION BUT THAT IS FOR THE PURPOSE OF SUPPORTING A LICENSED
PERSONNEL AND THEIR PROFESSIONAL DEVELOPMENT.
SECTION 3. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
-5- HB26-1291

preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
-6- HB26-1291